Ohio, session 136, HB27.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Ohio: Section 1. That sections 4501.21 and 4503.733 be amended and section 5534.90 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 4501.21. (A) There is hereby created in the state treasury the license plate contribution fund. The fund shall consist of all contributions for specialty license plates paid by motor vehicle registrants and collected by the registrar of motor vehicles pursuant to the Revised Code sections referenced in division (B) of this section. (B) The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar collects in the fund as follows: The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.491 of the Revised Code to the breast cancer fund of Ohio, which shall use that money only to pay for programs that provide assistance and education to Ohio breast cancer patients and that improve access for such patients to quality health care and clinical trials and shall not use any of the money for abortion information, counseling, services, or other abortion-related activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.492 of the Revised Code to the organization cancer support community central Ohio, which shall deposit the money into the Sheryl L. Kraner Fund of that organization. Cancer support community central Ohio shall expend the money it receives pursuant to this division only in the same manner and for the same purposes as that organization expends other money in that fund. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.493 of the Revised Code to the autism society of Ohio, which shall use the contributions for programs and autism awareness efforts throughout the state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.494 of the Revised Code to the national multiple sclerosis society for distribution in equal amounts to the northwestern Ohio, Ohio buckeye, and Ohio valley chapters of the national multiple sclerosis society. These chapters shall use the money they receive under this section to assist in paying the expenses they incur in providing services directly to their clients. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.495 of the Revised Code to the national pancreatic cancer foundation, which shall use the money it receives under this section to assist those who have pancreatic cancer and their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.496 of the Revised Code to the Ohio sickle cell and health association, which shall use the contributions to help support educational, clinical, and social support services for adults who have sickle cell disease. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.497 of the Revised Code to the St. Baldrick's foundation, which shall use the contributions for its research and other programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.498 of the Revised Code to special olympics Ohio, inc., which shall use the contributions for its programs, charitable efforts, and other activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.499 of the Revised Code to the children's glioma cancer foundation, which shall use the contributions for its research and other programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.4910 of the Revised Code to the KylerStrong foundation, which shall use the contributions to raise awareness of brain cancer caused by diffuse intrinsic pontine glioma and to fund research for the cure of such cancer. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.4911 of the Revised Code to the research institution for childhood cancer at nationwide children's hospital, which shall use the contributions to fund research for the cure of childhood cancers. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.4912 of the Revised Code to the Ben Morrison memorial fund, which shall use the contributions for scholarships and other programs that support mental health. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.50 of the Revised Code to the future farmers of America foundation, which shall deposit the contributions into its general account to be used for educational and scholarship purposes of the future farmers of America foundation. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.501 of the Revised Code to the 4-H youth development program of the Ohio state university extension program, which shall use those contributions to pay the expenses it incurs in conducting its educational activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.502 of the Revised Code to the Ohio cattlemen's foundation, which shall use those contributions for scholarships and other educational activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.505 of the Revised Code to the organization Ohio region phi theta kappa, which shall use those contributions for scholarships for students who are members of that organization. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.506 of the Revised Code to Ohio demolay, which shall use the contributions for scholarships, educational programs, and any other programs or events the organization holds or sponsors in this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.507 of the Revised Code to the Ohio aerospace institute, which shall use those contributions to facilitate student internships in aerospace and educational programming. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.508 of the Revised Code to the organization bottoms up diaper drive to provide funding for that organization for collecting and delivering diapers to parents in need. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.509 of the Revised Code to a kid again, incorporated for distribution in equal amounts to the Ohio chapters of a kid again. The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.51 of the Revised Code to the university or college whose name or marking or design appears on collegiate license plates that are issued to a person under that section. A university or college that receives contributions from the fund shall deposit the contributions into its general scholarship fund. The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.512 of the Revised Code to the Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated Delta Theta Omega chapter in Ohio. The Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated Delta Theta Omega chapter shall use the contributions for the development and perpetuation of scholarship, leadership, citizenship, fidelity, and brotherhood among men and youth in this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.514 of the Revised Code to the university of Notre Dame in South Bend, Indiana, for purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the university of Notre Dame to effectuate the distribution of such funds as provided in this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.516 of the Revised Code to Marshall university in Huntington, West Virginia, for purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with Marshall university to effectuate the distribution of such funds as provided in this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.517 of the Revised Code to the university of Alabama in Tuscaloosa, Alabama, for purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the university of Alabama to effectuate the distribution of such funds as provided in this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.518 of the Revised Code to the Nationwide children's hospital, which shall use the contributions for the "On Our Sleeves" campaign. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.519 of the Revised Code equally to NAMI Ohio (national alliance on mental illness of Ohio), Ohio peer recovery organizations, and OCAAR (Ohio citizen advocates for addiction recovery). The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.520 of the Revised Code to Purdue university in West Lafayette, Indiana, for purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with Purdue university to effectuate the distribution of such funds as provided in this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.521 of the Revised Code to the Ohio bicycle federation to assist that organization in paying for the educational programs it sponsors in support of Ohio cyclists of all ages. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.522 of the Revised Code to the "friends of Perry's victory and international peace memorial, incorporated," a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this state, to assist that organization in paying the expenses it incurs in sponsoring or holding charitable, educational, and cultural events at the monument. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.523 of the Revised Code to the fairport lights foundation, which shall use the money to pay for the restoration, maintenance, and preservation of the lighthouses of fairport harbor. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.524 of the Revised Code to the Massillon tiger football booster club, which shall use the contributions only to promote and support the football team of Washington high school of the Massillon city school district. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.525 of the Revised Code to the United States power squadron district seven which shall annually distribute the contributions in equal amounts to all United States power squadrons located in the state. Each power squadron district shall use the money it receives under this section to pay for the educational boating programs each district holds or sponsors within this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.526 of the Revised Code to the Ohio district Kiwanis foundation of the Ohio district of Kiwanis international, which shall use the money it receives under this section to pay the costs of its educational and humanitarian activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.528 of the Revised Code to the Ohio children's alliance, which shall use the money it receives under this section to pay the expenses it incurs in advancing its mission of sustainably improving the provision of services to children, young adults, and families in this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.529 of the Revised Code to the Ohio nurses foundation. The foundation shall use the money it receives under this section to provide educational scholarships to assist individuals who aspire to join the nursing profession, to assist nurses in the nursing profession who seek to advance their education, and to support persons conducting nursing research concerning the evidence-based practice of nursing and the improvement of patient outcomes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.53 of the Revised Code to the Indiana Kentucky Ohio regional council of carpenters. The council shall use the money it receives to assist its members who are experiencing financial hardship. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.531 of the Revised Code to the thank you foundation, incorporated, a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this state, to assist that organization in paying for the charitable activities and programs it sponsors in support of United States military personnel, veterans, and their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.532 of the Revised Code to the Ohio history connection, which shall use the contributions for the benefit of the Paul Laurence Dunbar house. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.533 of the Revised Code to the nonprofit organization Ohio conference of teamsters and industry health and welfare fund, which shall use the contributions to further the nonprofit's mission. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.534 of the Revised Code to the disabled American veterans department of Ohio, to be used for programs that serve disabled American veterans and their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.536 of the Revised Code to save a warrior, incorporated, which shall use the contributions to prevent suicide by active members of the armed forces of the United States, veterans of those armed forces, and first responders. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.542 of the Revised Code to the Ohio craft brewers association. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.541 of the Revised Code to Dolly Parton's imagination library of Ohio. The library shall use the money it receives under this section for operational costs, including the distribution of books. The registrar shall pay the contributions that are paid to the registrar pursuant to section 4503.545 of the Revised Code to the national rifle association foundation, which shall use the money to pay the costs of the educational activities and programs the foundation holds or sponsors in this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.55 of the Revised Code to the pro football hall of fame, which shall deposit the contributions into a special bank account that it establishes and which shall be separate and distinct from any other account the pro football hall of fame maintains, to be used exclusively for the purpose of promoting the pro football hall of fame as a travel destination. The registrar shall pay to the Ohio pet fund the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.551 of the Revised Code and any other money from any other source, including donations, gifts, and grants, that is designated by the source to be paid to the Ohio pet fund. The Ohio pet fund shall use the moneys it receives under this section to support programs for the sterilization of dogs and cats and for educational programs concerning the proper veterinary care of those animals, and for expenses of the Ohio pet fund that are reasonably necessary for it to obtain and maintain its tax-exempt status and to perform its duties. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.552 of the Revised Code to the rock and roll hall of fame and museum, incorporated. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.553 of the Revised Code to the Ohio coalition for animals, incorporated, a nonprofit corporation. Except as provided in division (B) of this section, the coalition shall distribute the money to its members, and the members shall use the money only to pay for educational, charitable, and other programs of each coalition member that provide care for unwanted, abused, and neglected horses. The Ohio coalition for animals may use a portion of the money to pay for reasonable marketing costs incurred in the design and promotion of the license plate and for administrative costs incurred in the disbursement and management of funds received under this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.554 of the Revised Code to the Ohio state council of the knights of Columbus, which shall use the contributions to pay for its charitable activities and programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.555 of the Revised Code to the western reserve historical society, which shall use the contributions to fund the Crawford auto aviation museum. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.556 of the Revised Code to the Erica J. Holloman foundation, inc., for the awareness of triple negative breast cancer. The foundation shall use the contributions for charitable and educational purposes. The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.557 of the Revised Code to the central Ohio chapter of the Ronald McDonald house charities, which shall distribute the contribution to the chapter of the Ronald McDonald house charities in whose geographic territory the person who paid the contribution resides. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.559 of the Revised Code to playhouse square, located in Cleveland, Ohio, which shall use the contributions to further its mission of presenting and producing a wide variety of quality performing arts, advancing arts education, and creating a superior destination for entertainment, business, and residential living. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.561 of the Revised Code to the state of Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., which shall deposit the contributions into a special bank account that it establishes. The special bank account shall be separate and distinct from any other account the state of Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., maintains and shall be used exclusively for the purpose of protecting, enhancing, restoring, and managing wetlands and conserving wildlife habitat. The state of Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., annually shall notify the registrar in writing of the name, address, and account to which such payments are to be made. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.562 of the Revised Code to the Mahoning river consortium, which shall use the money to pay the expenses it incurs in restoring and maintaining the Mahoning river watershed. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.564 of the Revised Code to the Glen Helen association to pay expenses related to the Glen Helen nature preserve. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.565 of the Revised Code to the conservancy for Cuyahoga valley national park, which shall use the money in support of the park. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.566 of the Revised Code to the Ottawa national wildlife refuge, which shall use the contributions for wildlife preservation purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.567 of the Revised Code to the girls on the run of Franklin county, inc., which shall use the contributions to support the activities of the organization. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.569 of the Revised Code to the Ohio bird sanctuary, located in Mansfield, Ohio, which shall use the contributions for purposes of its operations, bird care and rehabilitation, and educational programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.576 of the Revised Code to the Ohio state beekeepers association, which shall use those contributions to promote beekeeping, provide educational information about beekeeping, and to support other state and local beekeeping programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.577 of the Revised Code to the national aviation hall of fame, which shall use the contributions to fulfill its mission of honoring aerospace legends to inspire future leaders. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.578 of the Revised Code to keep Ohio beautiful, incorporated, which shall use the contributions towards its mission of empowering Ohio communities to take greater responsibility for improving the local environment through litter prevention, beautification, community greening, waste reduction, and recycling. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.579 of the Revised Code to the Ohio state coalition-national council of negro women, incorporated, which shall use the contributions for educational purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.581 of the Revised Code to the Ohio past detachment commander's club, inc., which shall use the contributions to support the activities of the organization. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.582 of the Revised Code to the progressive animal welfare society adoption center, inc., which shall use the contributions to support the activities of the center. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.583 of the Revised Code to the American legion, department of Ohio, inc., which shall use the contributions to support the activities of the organization. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.584 of the Revised Code to the Ohio natural energy foundation to fund scholarships for students pursuing careers in the oil and natural gas industry. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.585 of the Revised Code to the Terrace Park recreation committee, inc. to offer scholarships to young athletes of, and maintain athletic facilities in, the municipal corporation of Terrace Park. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.586 of the Revised Code to the Ohio mountain bike alliance. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.588 of the Revised Code to the Ohio grange patrons of husbandry foundation, which shall use the contributions to support the activities of the organization. The registrar shall pay to a sports commission created pursuant to section 4503.591 of the Revised Code each contribution the registrar receives under that section that an applicant pays to obtain license plates that bear the logo of a professional sports team located in the county of that sports commission and that is participating in the license plate program pursuant to division (E) of that section, irrespective of the county of residence of an applicant. The registrar shall pay to a community charity each contribution the registrar receives under section 4503.591 of the Revised Code that an applicant pays to obtain license plates that bear the logo of a professional sports team that is participating in the license plate program pursuant to division (G) of that section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.592 of the Revised Code to pollinator partnership's monarch wings across Ohio program, which shall use the contributions for the protection and preservation of the monarch butterfly and pollinator corridor in Ohio and for educational programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.594 of the Revised Code to pelotonia, which shall use the contributions for the purpose of supporting cancer research. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.595 of the Revised Code to the Stan Hywet hall and gardens. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.596 of the Revised Code to the Cuyahoga valley scenic railroad. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.597 of the Revised Code to the Circleville pumpkin show, incorporated, which shall use the contributions to promote good will surrounding the Circleville pumpkin show as a nonprofit annual event. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.598 of the Revised Code equally to the Jackson local schools foundation and the Jackson high school alumni association. The foundation and alumni association shall use the contributions for the foundation's and alumni association's purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.67 of the Revised Code to the Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.68 of the Revised Code to the girl scouts of Ohio's heartland. The girl scouts of Ohio's heartland shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner throughout the state to regional councils of the girl scouts. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.69 of the Revised Code to the Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.70 of the Revised Code to the charitable foundation of the grand lodge of Ohio, f. & a. m., which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.701 of the Revised Code to the Prince Hall grand lodge of free and accepted masons of Ohio, which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.702 of the Revised Code to the Ohio Association of the Improved Benevolent and Protective Order of the Elks of the World, which shall use the funds for charitable purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.703 of the Revised Code to the Ohio state moose association. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.704 of the Revised Code to the Antioch shrine foundation located in the municipal corporation of Dayton. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.71 of the Revised Code to the fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall deposit the fees into its general account to be used for purposes of the fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.711 of the Revised Code to the fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall deposit the contributions into an account that it creates to be used for the purpose of advancing and protecting the law enforcement profession, promoting improved law enforcement methods, and teaching respect for law and order. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.712 of the Revised Code to Ohio concerns of police survivors, which shall use those contributions to provide whatever assistance may be appropriate to the families of Ohio law enforcement officers who are killed in the line of duty. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.713 of the Revised Code to the greater Cleveland peace officers memorial society, which shall use those contributions to honor law enforcement officers who have died in the line of duty and support its charitable purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.714 of the Revised Code to the Ohio association of chiefs of police. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.715 of the Revised Code to the community foundation of Ohio's electric cooperatives, which shall use the contributions to recognize and memorialize fallen or injured lineworkers and support their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.716 of the Revised Code to the fallen timbers battlefield preservation commission, which shall use the contributions to further the mission of the commission. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.72 of the Revised Code to the organization known on March 31, 2003, as the Ohio CASA/GAL association, a private, nonprofit corporation organized under Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code. The Ohio CASA/GAL association shall use these contributions to pay the expenses it incurs in administering a program to secure the proper representation in the courts of this state of abused, neglected, and dependent children, and for the training and supervision of persons participating in that program. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.722 of the Revised Code to the Down Syndrome Association of Central Ohio, which shall use the contributions for advocacy purposes throughout the state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.724 of the Revised Code to the Ohio Chapter of the American Foundation for Suicide Prevention, which shall use the contributions for programs, education, and advocacy purposes throughout the state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.726 of the Revised Code to the Ohio suicide prevention foundation, which shall use the contributions for suicide prevention programs, education, and advocacy. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.725 of the Revised Code to the ALS united Ohio, incorporated, which shall split the contributions between that organization and the ALS association in accordance with any agreement between the two organizations. The contributions shall be used to discover treatments and a cure for ALS, and to serve, advocate for, and empower people affected by ALS to live their lives to the fullest. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.73 of the Revised Code to Wright B. Flyer, incorporated, which shall deposit the contributions into its general account to be used for purposes of Wright B. Flyer, incorporated. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.732 of the Revised Code to the Siegel Shuster society, a nonprofit organization dedicated to commemorating and celebrating the creation of Superman in Cleveland, Ohio. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.733 of the Revised Code to the central Ohio chapter of the juvenile diabetes research foundationbreakthrough T1D, which shall distribute use the contributions to the chapters of the juvenile diabetes research foundation in whose geographic territory the person who paid the contribution residesfor its mission of accelerating life-changing breakthroughs to cure, prevent, and treat type 1 diabetes and its complications. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.734 of the Revised Code to the Ohio highway patrol auxiliary foundation, which shall use the contributions to fulfill the foundation's mission of supporting law enforcement education and assistance. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.735 of the Revised Code to the heart4seniors/healthcare evolution alert response technology foundation, inc., which shall use the contributions for purposes of the foundation's mission. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.74 of the Revised Code to the Columbus zoological park association, which shall disburse the moneys to Ohio's major metropolitan zoos, as defined in section 4503.74 of the Revised Code, in accordance with a written agreement entered into by the major metropolitan zoos. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.741 of the Revised Code to the Ohio house rabbit rescue, which shall use the contributions for its rescue, adoption, and educational programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.75 of the Revised Code to the rotary foundation, located on March 31, 2003, in Evanston, Illinois, to be placed in a fund known as the permanent fund and used to endow educational and humanitarian programs of the rotary foundation. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.751 of the Revised Code to the Ohio association of realtors, which shall deposit the contributions into a property disaster relief fund maintained under the Ohio realtors charitable and education foundation. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.752 of the Revised Code to buckeye corvettes, incorporated, which shall use the contributions to pay for its charitable activities and programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.754 of the Revised Code to the municipal corporation of Twinsburg. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.755 of the Revised Code to the little brown jug society to assist the society in maintaining, promulgating, and operating the little brown jug as part of Ohio's rich harness racing history. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.763 of the Revised Code to the Ohio history connection to be used solely to build, support, and maintain the Ohio battleflag collection within the Ohio history connection. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.764 of the Revised Code to the Medina county historical society, which shall use those contributions to distribute between the various historical societies and museums in Medina county. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.765 of the Revised Code to the Amaranth grand chapter foundation, which shall use the contributions for communal outreach, charitable service, and scholarship purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.766 of the Revised Code to the Ohio society daughters of the American revolution, which shall deposit the contributions into its general account to be used for continuing the organization's endeavors in service, historic preservation, education, and patriotism. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.767 of the Revised Code to folds of honor of central Ohio, which shall use the contributions to provide scholarships to spouses and children either of disabled veterans or of members of any branch of the armed forces who died during their service. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.85 of the Revised Code to the Ohio sea grant college program to be used for Lake Erie area research projects. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.851 of the Revised Code to West Virginia university in Morgantown, West Virginia for purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with West Virginia university to effectuate the distribution of such funds as provided in this section. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.86 of the Revised Code to the Ohio Lincoln highway historic byway, which shall use those contributions solely to promote and support the historical preservation and advertisement of the Lincoln highway in this state. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.87 of the Revised Code to the Grove City little league dream field fund, which shall use those contributions solely to build, maintain, and improve youth baseball fields within the municipal corporation of Grove City. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.871 of the Revised Code to the Solon city school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.872 of the Revised Code to the Canton city school district. The district may use the contributions for student welfare, but shall not use the contributions for any political purpose or to pay salaries of district employees. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.873 of the Revised Code to Padua Franciscan high school located in the municipal corporation of Parma. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.874 of the Revised Code to St. Edward high school located in the municipal corporation of Lakewood. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.875 of the Revised Code to Walsh Jesuit high school located in the municipal corporation of Cuyahoga Falls. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.876 of the Revised Code to the North Royalton city school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.877 of the Revised Code to the Independence local school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.878 of the Revised Code to the Cuyahoga Heights local school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors, shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.879 of the Revised Code to the west technical high school alumni association, which shall use the contributions for activities sponsored by the association. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.88 of the Revised Code to the Kenston local school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services that assist in developing or maintaining a culture of environmental responsibility and an innovative science, technology, engineering, art, and math (S.T.E.A.M.) curriculum to the school district's students. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.881 of the Revised Code to La Salle high school in the municipal corporation of Cincinnati. The high school shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.882 of the Revised Code to St. John's Jesuit high school and academy located in the municipal corporation of Toledo. The school shall use the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance for students attending the school. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.883 of the Revised Code to St. Charles preparatory school located in the municipal corporation of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.884 of the Revised Code to Archbishop Moeller high school located in the municipal corporation of Cincinnati. The high school shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.885 of the Revised Code to the Revere schools foundation. The foundation shall use the contributions to promote its mission, including awarding scholarships to honor young people who are meaningfully engaged in their school or community. The foundation shall not use the contributions for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.886 of the Revised Code to Stephen T. Badin high school in the municipal corporation of Hamilton. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.887 of the Revised Code to Bishop Hartley high school located in the municipal corporation of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.888 of the Revised Code to St. Vincent-St. Mary high school located in the municipal corporation of Akron. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.89 of the Revised Code to the American red cross of greater Columbus on behalf of the Ohio chapters of the American red cross, which shall use the contributions for disaster readiness, preparedness, and response programs on a statewide basis. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.891 of the Revised Code to the Ohio lions foundation. The foundation shall use the contributions for charitable and educational purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.892 of the Revised Code to the Hudson city school district. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.893 of the Revised Code to the Harrison Central jr./sr. high school located in the municipal corporation of Cadiz. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.894 of the Revised Code to the Blanchester schools foundation for funding student scholarships and for funding activities and programs for at-risk students. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.895 of the Revised Code to the Lakeside Chautauqua foundation. The foundation shall use the contributions it receives for conservation and preservation of Lake Erie and the surrounding ecosystem. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.896 of the Revised Code to the American legion auxiliary department of Ohio. The auxiliary department shall use the contributions it receives to support the American legion, current and former military members, and their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.899 of the Revised Code to the Cleveland clinic foundation, which shall use the contributions to support Cleveland clinic children's education, research, and patient services. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.90 of the Revised Code to the nationwide children's hospital foundation. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.901 of the Revised Code to the Ohio association for pupil transportation, which shall use the money to support transportation programs, provide training to school transportation professionals, and support other initiatives for school transportation safety. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.902 of the Revised Code to St. Ignatius high school located in the municipal corporation of Cleveland. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.903 of the Revised Code to the Brecksville-Broadview Heights city school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.904 of the Revised Code to the Chagrin Falls exempted village school district. The school district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school district hires to provide those services. The school district also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive training in providing such services to the students of the school district. The school district shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.905 of the Revised Code to the Cuyahoga valley career center. The career center shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the career center's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The career center's superintendent or in the career center's superintendent's discretion, the school board or appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the career center hires to provide those services. The career center also may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the faculty of the career center to receive training in providing such services to the students of the career center. The career center shall ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the career center is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The career center shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.906 of the Revised Code to the Stow-Munroe Falls city school district. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.907 of the Revised Code to the Twinsburg city school district. The school district shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.908 of the Revised Code to St. Xavier high school located in Springfield township in Hamilton county. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.909 of the Revised Code to the Grandview Heights city school district, which shall use the contributions for its gifted programs and special education and related services. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.92 of the Revised Code to support our troops, incorporated, a national nonprofit corporation, which shall use those contributions in accordance with its articles of incorporation and for the benefit of servicemembers of the armed forces of the United States and their families when they are in financial need. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.931 of the Revised Code to healthy New Albany, which shall use the contributions for its community programs, events, and other activities. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.932 of the Revised Code to habitat for humanity of Ohio, inc., which shall use the contributions for its projects related to building affordable houses. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.933 of the Revised Code to Ohio citizens for the arts foundation, which shall use the contributions for advocacy, education, and professional development programs. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.934 of the Revised Code to Ohio society for respiratory care of the American association for respiratory care, incorporated, which shall use the contributions to benefit the Ohio society for respiratory care student scholarship fund. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.935 of the Revised Code to Jesup W. Scott high school's principal activities fund. The high school shall use the contributions to enhance learning opportunities for the high school's students. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.936 of the Revised Code to the Hilliard Davidson baseball club, which shall use the contributions to support the team. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.94 of the Revised Code to the Michelle's leading star foundation, which shall use the money solely to fund the rental, lease, or purchase of the simulated driving curriculum of the Michelle's leading star foundation by boards of education of city, exempted village, local, and joint vocational school districts. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.941 of the Revised Code to the Ohio chapter international society of arboriculture, which shall use the money to increase consumer awareness on the importance of proper tree care and to raise funds for the chapter's educational efforts. The registrar shall pay the contributions received pursuant to section 4503.942 of the Revised Code to zero, the end of prostate cancer, incorporated, a nonprofit organization, which shall use those contributions to raise awareness of prostate cancer, to support research to end prostate cancer, and to support prostate cancer patients and their families. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.943 of the Revised Code to the nonprofit organization weirdo cat lovers of Cleveland, which shall use the contributions to further its mission of assisting pet parents with emergency veterinary bills for their feline companions, providing food and litter to those in economic need, and controlling feral cat populations through the process of trap-neuter-return to the community. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.944 of the Revised Code to the eastern European congress of Ohio, which shall use the contributions for charitable and educational purposes. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.945 of the Revised Code to the Summit metro parks foundation, which shall use the money in support of the Summit county metro parks. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.946 of the Revised Code to the Ohio society, sons of the American revolution, which shall use the contributions for special projects related to historical education. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.951 of the Revised Code to the Cincinnati city school district. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.952 of the Revised Code to Hawken school located in northeast Ohio. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.953 of the Revised Code to Gilmour academy located in the municipal corporation of Gates Mills. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.954 of the Revised Code to University school located in the suburban area near the municipal corporation of Cleveland. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.955 of the Revised Code to Saint Albert the Great school located in North Royalton. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to receive training in providing those services. The school principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any other purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.956 of the Revised Code to the Liberty Center local school district, which shall use the contributions for its gifted programs and special education and related services. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.957 of the Revised Code to John F. Kennedy Catholic school located in Warren. The school shall not use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.958 of the Revised Code to Elder high school located in the municipal corporation of Cincinnati. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students, twenty-five per cent of the contributions to benefit arts and enrichment at the school, and twenty-five per cent of the contributions to benefit athletics at the school. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.959 of the Revised Code to the Dublin food pantry, which shall use the contributions to provide food, hygiene products, and other resources to individuals and families experiencing food insecurity. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.961 of the Revised Code to Fairfield senior high school located in the municipal corporation of Fairfield. The high school shall not use the contributions for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.962 of the Revised Code to Hamilton high school located in the municipal corporation of Hamilton. The high school shall not use the contributions for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.963 of the Revised Code to Ross high school located in Ross township in Butler county. The high school shall not use the contributions for any political purpose. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.964 of the Revised Code to Chardon hilltopper gridiron club. The club shall use contributions to fund college and career technical training scholarships for students. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.965 of the Revised Code to the Norton music boosters association. The association shall use the contributions to provide financial assistance to the Norton high school music boosters for equipment, travel, and programming expenses. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.97 of the Revised Code to the friends of united Hatzalah of Israel, which shall use the money to support united Hatzalah of Israel, which provides free emergency medical first response throughout Israel. The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 4503.98 of the Revised Code to the Westerville parks foundation to support the programs and activities of the foundation and its mission of pursuing the city of Westerville's vision of becoming "A City Within A Park." (C) All investment earnings of the license plate contribution fund shall be credited to the fund. Not later than the first day of May of every year, the registrar shall distribute to each entity described in division (B) of this section the investment income the fund earned the previous calendar year. The amount of such a distribution paid to an entity shall be proportionate to the amount of money the entity received from the fund during the previous calendar year. Sec. 4503.733. (A) The owner or lessee of any passenger car, noncommercial motor vehicle, recreational vehicle, or other vehicle of a class approved by the registrar of motor vehicles may apply to the registrar for the registration of the vehicle and issuance of "juvenile diabetes research foundation""Breakthrough T1D" license plates. An application made under this section may be combined with a request for a special reserved license plate under section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code. Upon receipt of the completed application and compliance by the applicant with divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the registrar shall issue to the applicant the appropriate vehicle registration and a set of "juvenile diabetes research foundation""Breakthrough T1D" license plates and a validation sticker, or a validation sticker alone when required by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. In addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily inscribed on the license plates, "juvenile diabetes research foundation""Breakthrough T1D" license plates shall be inscribed with identifying words or markings that are jointly designed and selected by all Ohio chapters of the juvenile diabetes research foundation the breakthrough T1D organization and approved by the registrar. "Juvenile diabetes research foundation""Breakthrough T1D" license plates shall display county identification stickers that identify the county of registration as required under section 4503.19 of the Revised Code. (B) The "juvenile diabetes research foundation""Breakthrough T1D" license plates and a validation sticker, or validation sticker alone, shall be issued upon receipt of a contribution as provided in division (C)(1) of this section and upon payment of the regular license tax as prescribed under section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, any applicable motor vehicle license tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised Code, any applicable additional fee prescribed by section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code, a bureau of motor vehicles administrative fee of ten dollars, and compliance with all other applicable laws relating to the registration of motor vehicles. (C)(1) For each application for registration and registration renewal notice the registrar receives under this section, the registrar shall collect a contribution of twenty-five dollars. The registrar shall transmit this contribution into the state treasury to the credit of the license plate contribution fund created in section 4501.21 of the Revised Code. (2) The registrar shall deposit the bureau administrative fee of ten dollars, the purpose of which is to compensate the bureau for additional services required in the issuing of "juvenile diabetes research foundation""Breakthrough T1D" license plates, into the state treasury to the credit of the public safety - highway purposes fund created by section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5534.90. The bridge spanning the grand river, located in Lake county and being part of the highway known as interstate route number ninety, shall be known as the "Specialist Jacob A. Ashton Memorial Bridge." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers upon the bridge or its approaches indicating its name. Section 2. That existing sections 4501.21 and 4503.733 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Speaker ___________________ of the House of Representatives. President ___________________ of the Senate. Passed ________________________, 20____ Approved ________________________, 20____ Governor. The section numbering of law of a general and permanent nature is complete and in conformity with the Revised Code. Director, Legislative Service Commission. Filed in the office of the Secretary of State at Columbus, Ohio, on the ____ day of ___________, A. D. 20____. Secretary of State. File No. _________	Effective Date ___________________